District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.26

Procurement authority of the Chief Financial Officer.

The Chief Financial Officer shall carry out procurement of goods and services for the Office of the Chief Financial Officer through a procurement office or division which shall operate independently of, and shall not be governed by, the Office of Contracting and Procurement established under Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2 [Chapter 3A of Title 2] or any successor office, except the provisions applicable under such unit to procurement carried out by the Chief Procurement Officer established by § 2-301.05 [§ 2-352.01] or any successor office shall apply with respect to the procurement carried out by the Chief Financial Officer’s procurement office or division.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 774, Pub. L. 93-198, § 424b
as added Oct. 16, 2006, 120 Stat. 2037, Pub. L. 109-356, § 203(a)(1)
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 201(a), 59 DCR 6190

Effective Dates

Section 203(c) of Pub. L. 109-356, as amended by Pub. L. 110-5, § 21073(h), provided: “This section and the amendments made by this section shall take effect October 16, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Section 201(a) of D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “Chapter 3A of Title 2” for “Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2”; and substituted “§ 2-352.01” for “§ 2-301.05” in this section.

Section 201(b) of D.C. Law 19-171 provided that § 201(a) of the act shall become effective upon Congressional enactment.

Section 201(b) of D.C. Law 19-171 provided that § 201(a) of the act shall become effective upon congressional enactment.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “Chapter 3A of Title 2” for “Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2”; and substituted “§ 2-352.01” for “§ 2-301.05.”